Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2762.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 36, chapter 8, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 36-917, to read: START_STATUTE36-917. Food products derived from cultivated cells; labeling The manufacturer, packager or retailer of a food product that is derived from cultivated cells shall place a label on the food product's packaging that states:  "cell-cultivated" or "cell-cultured".END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Short title This act may be cited as the "Andy Groseta Act". APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR JUNE 19, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE JUNE 22, 2026.